tests/N-various_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun аха:
    аха<n><nom> : аха
    аха<n><gen> : ахын
    аха<n><dat> : ахада
    аха<n><acc> : ахые
    аха<n><ins> : ахаар
    аха<n><com> : ахатай
    аха<n><abl> : ахаһаа
    аха<n><pl><nom> : аханар
    аха<n><pl><gen> : аханарай
    аха<n><pl><dat> : аханарта
    аха<n><pl><acc> : аханарые
    аха<n><pl><ins> : аханараар
    аха<n><pl><com> : аханартай
    аха<n><pl><abl> : аханарһаа

  Noun һургуули:
    һургуули<n><nom> : һургуули
    һургуули<n><gen> : һургуулиин
    һургуули<n><dat> : һургуулида
    һургуули<n><acc> : һургуулиие
    һургуули<n><ins> : һургууляар
    һургуули<n><com> : һургуулитай
    һургуули<n><abl> : һургуулиһаа
    һургуули<n><pl><nom> : һургуулинууд
    һургуули<n><pl><gen> : һургуулинуудай
    һургуули<n><pl><dat> : һургуулинуудта
    һургуули<n><pl><acc> : һургуулинуудые
    һургуули<n><pl><ins> : һургуулинуудаар
    һургуули<n><pl><com> : һургуулинуудтай
    һургуули<n><pl><abl> : һургуулинуудһаа

  Noun ном:
    ном<n><nom> : ном
    ном<n><gen> : номой
    ном<n><dat> : номдо
    ном<n><acc> : номые
    ном<n><ins> : номоор
    ном<n><com> : номтой
    ном<n><abl> : номһоо
    ном<n><pl><nom> : номууд
    ном<n><pl><gen> : номуудай
    ном<n><pl><dat> : номуудта
    ном<n><pl><acc> : номуудые
    ном<n><pl><ins> : номуудаар
    ном<n><pl><com> : номуудтай
    ном<n><pl><abl> : номуудһаа

  Noun нохой:
    нохой<n><nom> : нохой
    нохой<n><gen> : нохойн
    нохой<n><dat> : нохойдо
    нохой<n><acc> : нохойе
    нохой<n><ins> : нохойгоор
    нохой<n><com> : нохойтой
    нохой<n><abl> : нохойһоо
    нохой<n><pl><nom> : нохойнууд
    нохой<n><pl><gen> : нохойнуудай
    нохой<n><pl><dat> : нохойнуудта
    нохой<n><pl><acc> : нохойнуудые
    нохой<n><pl><ins> : нохойнуудаар
    нохой<n><pl><com> : нохойнуудтай
    нохой<n><pl><abl> : нохойнуудһаа

  Noun жороо:
    жороо<n><nom> : жороо
    жороо<n><gen> : жороогой
    жороо<n><dat> : жороодо
    жороо<n><acc> : жороое
    жороо<n><ins> : жороогоор
    жороо<n><com> : жороотой
    жороо<n><abl> : жорооһоо
    жороо<n><pl><nom> : жороонууд
    жороо<n><pl><gen> : жороонуудай
    жороо<n><pl><dat> : жороонуудта
    жороо<n><pl><acc> : жороонуудые
    жороо<n><pl><ins> : жороонуудаар
    жороо<n><pl><com> : жороонуудтай
    жороо<n><pl><abl> : жороонуудһаа

  Noun морин:
    морин<n><nom> : морин
    морин<n><gen> : мориной
    морин<n><dat> : мориндо
    морин<n><acc> : мориие
    морин<n><ins> : морёор
    морин<n><com> : [моритой, моринтой]
    морин<n><abl> : моринһоо
    морин<n><pl><nom> : морид
    морин<n><pl><gen> : моридой
    морин<n><pl><dat> : моридто
    морин<n><pl><acc> : моридые
    морин<n><pl><ins> : моридоор
    морин<n><pl><com> : моридтой
    морин<n><pl><abl> : моридһоо

  Noun һанаан:
    һанаан<n><nom> : һанаан
    һанаан<n><gen> : һанаанай
    һанаан<n><dat> : һанаанда
    һанаан<n><acc> : һанаае
    һанаан<n><ins> : һанаагаар
    һанаан<n><com> : һанаантай
    һанаан<n><abl> : һанаанһаа

  Noun ан:
    ан<n><nom> : ан
    ан<n><gen> : ангай
    ан<n><dat> : анда
    ан<n><acc> : ангые
    ан<n><ins> : ангаар
    ан<n><com> : антай
    ан<n><abl> : ангһаа
    ан<n><pl><nom> : ангууд
    ан<n><pl><gen> : ангуудай
    ан<n><pl><dat> : ангуудта
    ан<n><pl><acc> : ангуудые
    ан<n><pl><ins> : ангуудаар
    ан<n><pl><com> : ангуудтай
    ан<n><pl><abl> : ангуудһаа
